Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 4. Child Protection Act

Cross references. —

As to privilege communication by a licensed or certified mental health professional, see §

33-38-113

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Juvenile Courts §§ 45 to 51.

Construction and effect of statutes mandating consideration of, or creating presumptions regarding, domestic violence in awarding custody of children, 51 ALR5th 241.

§ 14-3-401.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Child Protection Act.”

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

Due process.—

Child Protection Act (CPA) clearly requires a noncustodial parent be given timely notice of the juvenile court proceedings and an opportunity to be heard regarding the placement of the child; the CPA expresses the clear and unequivocal rule of law that the juvenile court shall involve the noncustodial parent in the proceedings at the earliest possible time. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

Authority of Department of Family Services. —

Department of Family Services (DFS), a public social service agency, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 9-2-2101(a), with authority to oversee the custody and care of children in cases of abuse and neglect under the Child Protection Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

14-3-401

through

14-3-441

, was an “authorized agency” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

14-2-308

and

14-2-310

with authority to file a petition to terminate a mother's parental rights, even though DFS did not have custody of the children. State v. DH (In the Interest of LB), 2014 WY 10, 316 P.3d 1184,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 2014).

Cited

in

E.F.W. v. Saint Stephen’s Mission Indian High Sch., 51 F. Supp. 2d 1217, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 8693 (D. Wyo. 1999);
RS v. Dept. of Family Servs. (In re KLS), 2004 WY 87, 94 P.3d 1025,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(2004);
SLJ v. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re SJJ), 2005 WY 3, 104 P.3d 74,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(2005);
JA v. State, 2008 WY 15,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Feb. 8, 2008);
Jet v. State (In re Drt), 2010 WY 137, 241 P.3d 489,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Oct. 21, 2010); NC v. State, 2013 WY 2,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Jan 9, 2013); RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).

§ 14-3-402.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Adjudication” means a finding by the court or the jury, incorporated in a decree, as to the truth of the facts alleged in the petition;

“Adult” means an individual who has attained the age of majority;

“Child” means an individual who is under the age of majority;

“Clerk” means the clerk of a district court acting as the clerk of a juvenile court;

“Commissioner” means a district court commissioner;

“Court” means the juvenile court established by W.S.

5-8-101

;

“Custodian” means a person, institution or agency responsible for the child’s welfare and having legal custody of a child by court order or having actual physical custody and control of a child and acting in loco parentis;

“Deprivation of custody” means transfer of legal custody by the court from a parent or previous legal custodian to another person, agency, organization or institution;

“Judge” means the judge of the juvenile court;

“Legal custody” means a legal status created by court order which vests in a custodian the right to have physical custody of a minor, the right and duty to protect, train and discipline a minor, the duty to provide him with food, shelter, clothing, transportation, ordinary medical care, education and in an emergency, the right and duty to authorize surgery or other extraordinary medical care. The rights and duties of legal custody are subject to the rights and duties of the guardian of the person of the minor, and to residual parental rights and duties;

“Minor” means an individual who is under the age of majority;

“Neglected child” means a child:

Who has been subjected to neglect as defined in W.S. 14-3-202(a)(vii);

Who has been subjected to abuse as defined in W.S. 14-3-202(a)(ii).

through (IV) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 236, § 4.

“Parent” means either a natural or adoptive parent of the child, a person adjudged the parent of the child in judicial proceedings or a man presumed to be the father under W.S.

14-2-504

;

“Parties” include the child, his parents, guardian or custodian, the state of Wyoming and any other person made a party by an order to appear, or named by the juvenile court;

“Protective supervision” means a legal status created by court order following an adjudication of neglect, whereby the child is permitted to remain in his home subject to supervision by the department of family services, a county or state probation officer or other qualified agency or individual the court may designate;

“Residual parental rights and duties” means those rights and duties remaining with the parents after legal custody, guardianship of the person or both have been vested in another person, agency or institution. Residual parental rights and duties include but are not limited to:

The duty to support and provide necessities of life;

The right to consent to adoption;

The right to reasonable visitation unless restricted or prohibited by court order;

The right to determine the minor’s religious affiliation; and

The right to petition on behalf of the minor.

“Shelter care” means the temporary care of a child in physically unrestricting facilities pending court disposition or execution of a court order for placement or commitment;

“Ordinary medical care” means medical, dental and vision examinations, routine medical, dental and vision treatment and emergency surgical procedures, but does not include nonemergency surgical procedures;

“Temporary protective custody” means a legal status created prior to a shelter care hearing when a court, law enforcement officer, physician, physician’s assistant or nurse practitioner takes a child into protective custody pursuant to W.S.

14-3-405

. Temporary protective custody vests in a custodian the duty to protect the child and arrange for the provision of food, shelter, clothing, transportation, ordinary medical care and education. Temporary protective custody shall be transferred from the law enforcement officer, physician, physician’s assistant or nurse practitioner to the local child protection agency as soon as practicable to facilitate such care. Temporary protective custody divests the parent or custodian of his right to the custody and control of the child;

“Transportation” means as defined in W.S. 14-3-202(a)(xvii);

“Initial hearing” means a hearing held in accordance with W.S.

14-3-426

;

“Shelter care hearing” means a hearing held in accordance with W.S.

14-3-409

;

“Transfer hearing” means a hearing held in accordance with W.S.

14-6-237

;

“Another planned permanent living arrangement” means a permanency plan for youth sixteen (16) years of age or older other than reunification, adoption, legal guardianship or placement with a fit and willing relative;

“Qualified individual” means a person who meets the requirements of 42 U.S.C. § 675a(c)(1)(D);

“Qualified residential treatment program” means a program that meets the requirements of 42 U.S.C. § 672(k)(4);

“This act” means W.S.

14-3-401

through

14-3-441

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2001, ch. 61, § 2; 2003, ch. 93, § 2; 2005, ch. 236, §§ 2, 4; 2011, ch. 79, § 1; 2016 ch. 95, § 2, effective March 4, 2016; 2020 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(x), inserted “transportation” before “ordinary medical care”; rewrote the definition of “neglected child” in (a)(xii); in (a)(xvi), inserted “legal” before “custody”; and inserted (a)(xviii) through (a)(xx), redesignating former (a)(xviii) as present (a)(xxi).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (a)(xxi) through (a)(xxiii), and redesignated former (a)(xxi) as (a)(xxiv).

The 2016 amendment

renumbered former (a)(xxiv) as (a)(xxv), and added (a)(xxiv).

Laws 2016, ch. 95, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 4, 2016.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(xxv), (a)(xxvi); redesignated former (a)(xxv) as (a)(xxvii); and in (a)(xxvii), substituted “14-3-440” for “14-3-441.”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(xxv) substituted “14-3-441” for “14-3-440.”

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Residual parental rights.—

Mother’s claim that a permanency order should have designated her preferred adoptive parents as the court-ordered adoptive parents had not been waived, but failed on the merits where the permanency order had not terminated the mother’s parental rights or changed legal custody, and nothing in
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-3-431(k) (2017) required findings as to the merits of the prospective adoption applicants.
DM v. State (In re L-MHB), 2017 WY 110, 401 P.3d 949,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2017).

Jurisdiction. —

In a termination of parental rights proceedings, the father was a party over whom the court had jurisdiction, and his failure to comply with the case plan constituted neglect. RS v. Dept. of Family Servs. (In re KLS), 2004 WY 87, 94 P.3d 1025,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2004).

Neglected children. —

Trial court did not err in finding neglect under this section where: (1) the mother's daughter was unable to find the mother at home, so the daughter called a bar where the mother was known to frequent, (2) the mother and her boyfriend went to the bar nearly every night and drank, (3) the mother was drunk at the time her daughter called her, (4) the mother's boyfriend threatened the mother's father and the children with physical violence, (5) the children had seen the mother and boyfriend doing drugs, (6) there had been many family arguments and fighting, and (7) the oldest daughter had attempted, or at least threatened, suicide; thus, the circumstances constituted the failure or refusal to provide the adequate care and supervision necessary for the children's well-being. DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re H Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003).

Father had standing because he was adjudicated as neglectful based on the Mother's alleged violations of the consent decree. MR v. State (In the Interest of CDR), 2015 WY 79, 351 P.3d 264,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2015).

Court erred by revoking a consent decree in the neglect case because, although the court did not lose jurisdiction when the court was empowered to conduct a hearing and rule on the accusations, the court erred in concluding that the Mother violated the terms of the consent decree by drinking alcohol when the consent decree agreement did not expressly prohibit Mother from drinking but only required her to undergo alcohol/substance abuse evaluation and follow the regimen of treatment recommended. MR v. State (In the Interest of CDR), 2015 WY 79, 351 P.3d 264,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2015).

Juvenile court properly found that a mother had neglected her child by failing to provide adequate education for his well being because the child had numerous unexplained absences, the compulsory attendance statutes did not apply, the child protective services statutes and the Child Protection Act were complied with,and the mother received notice and an opportunity to be heard before the juvenile court made its findings. RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114, 334 P.3d 568,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2014).

Contempt proceeding. —

Adjudication of neglect under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-402

et seq., the Wyoming Child Protection Act, was entered against defendant for not providing adequate care necessary for the well-being of his minor children; the juvenile court ordered defendant to satisfy certain requirements within a specified period of time. Because the contempt proceeding against defendant was not conducted as an independent criminal action apart from the underlying juvenile case as required by Wyo. R. Crim. P. 42(c), with its own caption and docket number, the juvenile court never acquired jurisdiction to proceed; its judgment and sentence of contempt was null and void.
BD v. State, 2010 WY 18, 226 P.3d 272,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2010).

Cited

in

LW v. State (In the Interest of JW), 2010 WY 28, 226 P.3d 873,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Mar. 18, 2010); Jo v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (in the Interest of Re), 2011 WY 170, 267 P.3d 1092,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Dec. 28, 2011).

HP v. State, 2004 WY 82, 93 P.3d 982,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(2004).

Quoted in

DM v. State (In re L-MHB), 2017 WY 110, 401 P.3d 949,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2017).

Stated in

DT v. State, 2017 WY 36, 391 P.3d 1136,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights of unwed father to obstruct adoption of his child by withholding consent, 61 ALR5th 151.

§ 14-3-403.
Juvenile court authority over certain issues.

Coincident with proceedings concerning a minor alleged to be neglected, the court has jurisdiction to:

Determine questions concerning the right to legal custody of the minor;

Order any party to the proceedings to perform any acts, duties and responsibilities the court deems necessary; or

Order any party to the proceedings to refrain from any act or conduct the court deems detrimental to the best interest and welfare of the minor or essential to the enforcement of any lawful order of disposition of the minor made by the court.

Nothing contained in this act is construed to deprive the district court of jurisdiction to determine questions of custody, parental rights, guardianship or any other questions involving minors, when the questions are the subject of or incidental to suits or actions commenced in or transferred to the district court as provided by law, except:

If a petition involving the same child is pending in juvenile court or if continuing jurisdiction has been previously acquired by the juvenile court, the district court may certify the question of custody to the juvenile court; and

The district court at any time may request the juvenile court to make recommendations pertaining to guardianship or legal custody.

A party to the proceeding may file a petition for adoption or an appointment of guardianship in the underlying juvenile action in lieu of filing a petition with the district court.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2009, ch. 196, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (b)(i) and (b)(ii) and substituted “, except:” for the former period at the end of the introductory paragraph of (b); and added (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

Claim precluded.—

This section
precluded the mother's claim that the district court's jurisdiction
was deficient. SAS v. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re AGS), 2014 WY 143, 337 P.3d 470,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 2014).

Cited

in

In the Interest of MM v. Dep't of Family Servs., 2009 WY 28, 202 P.3d 409,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Mar. 3, 2009).

§ 14-3-404.
Venue; change of venue or judge.

Proceedings under this act may be commenced in the county where the child is living or is present when the proceedings are commenced. Change of venue or change of judge may be had under the circumstances and upon the terms and conditions provided by law in a civil action in the district court.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

§ 14-3-405.
Taking of child into custody; when permitted.

A child, or any other child residing in the same household, may be taken into custody by a law enforcement officer without a warrant or court order and without the consent of the parents, guardians or others exercising temporary or permanent control over the child when:

There are reasonable grounds to believe a child is abandoned, lost, suffering from illness or injury or seriously endangered by the child’s surroundings and immediate custody appears to be necessary for his protection;

The child’s conduct or behavior seriously endangers himself and immediate custody appears necessary; or

The child is as evidenced by an examination being abused or neglected by a parent, guardian or legal custodian, a member of the parent’s, guardian’s or legal custodian’s household or any other person known to the parent, guardian or legal custodian.

A child may be taken into temporary protective custody by a physician, physician’s assistant or nurse practitioner without a warrant or court order and without the consent of the parents, guardians or others exercising temporary or permanent control over the child when the physician, physician’s assistant or nurse practitioner treating the child, or a hospital in which the child is being treated, finds that there is reasonable cause to believe an imminent danger to the child’s life, health or safety exists unless the child is taken into protective custody, whether or not additional medical treatment is required, and there is not time to apply for a court order.

A district attorney may file an emergency petition, or the department of family services, a local law enforcement officer, an administrator of a hospital in which a child reasonably believed to have been abused or neglected is being treated, or any physician, physician’s assistant or nurse practitioner who treated the child may request the court for a protective order. After considering the emergency petition or request, the judge or commissioner, upon finding that there is reasonable cause to believe that a child has been abused or neglected and that the child, by continuing in his place of residence or in the care and custody of the person responsible for his health, safety and welfare, would be in imminent danger of his life, health or safety, may:

Issue an ex parte order or search warrant. The order shall place the child in the temporary protective custody of the local child protection agency;

Issue an emergency order or search warrant upon application and hearing, authorizing ordinary or emergency care of the child or authorizing a forensic examination to collect evidence.

Temporary protective custody shall not exceed forty-eight (48) hours, excluding weekends and legal holidays.

When necessary for the best interest or welfare of the child in temporary protective custody, a court may order medical or other necessary health care, including mental health and substance abuse care, notwithstanding the absence of a prior finding of child abuse or neglect.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2005, ch. 236, § 2; 2019 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted the language pertaining to consent in the introductory language in (a); and added (b) through (e).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “A child, or any other child residing in the same household, may” for “A child may,” in (a)(i), substituted “the child's” for “his,” added (a)(iii), and made related changes.

Due process.—

Juvenile court violated a father’s right to due process because it failed to give him reasonable notice and a meaningful opportunity to be heard in the child protection action; many of the requirements of the Child Protection Act were not followed because the father was not informed when the child was taken into protective custody or of the shelter care hearing; the father was materially prejudiced by the due process violations because his lack of involvement colored the juvenile court’s ruling. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

Cited

in

Lara v. State, 2001 WY 53, 25 P.3d 507,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2001); RS v. Dept. of Family Servs. (In re KLS), 2004 WY 87, 94 P.3d 1025,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(2004).

Applicability. —

Because children already had been adjudicated neglected before they were removed from their mother's custody and placed with relatives, the juvenile court correctly applied Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-3-429(a)(iv) instead of this section in deciding its conclusions of law.
RH v. State (In the Interest of DRS), 2011 WY 128, 261 P.3d 697,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2011).

§ 14-3-406.
Child in custody; no shelter care placement without court order; exceptions; notice to parent or guardian; release.

A child taken into temporary protective custody shall not be placed in shelter care without a court order unless shelter care is required to:

Protect the child’s person;

Prevent the child from being removed from the jurisdiction of the court; or

Provide the child having no parent, guardian, custodian or other responsible adult with supervision and care and return him to the court when required.

Any person taking a child into temporary protective custody under this act shall as soon as possible notify the child’s parent, guardian or custodian. Unless the child’s shelter care is authorized by court order or required for one (1) of the reasons in subsection (a) of this section, the child shall be released to the care of his parent, guardian, custodian or other responsible adult upon that person’s written promise to present the child before the court upon request.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2005, ch. 236, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “temporary protective custody” for “custody” in the introductory language in (a) and in (b), and made a related change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

Due process.—

Juvenile court violated a father’s right to due process because it failed to give him reasonable notice and a meaningful opportunity to be heard in the child protection action; many of the requirements of the Child Protection Act were not followed because the father was not informed when the child was taken into protective custody or of the shelter care hearing; the father was materially prejudiced by the due process violations because his lack of involvement colored the juvenile court’s ruling. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

Cited

in

Lara v. State, 2001 WY 53, 25 P.3d 507,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 14-3-407.
Shelter care; delivery of child pending hearing; placing children; notice if no court order.

If shelter care of a child appears necessary to the person taking custody of the child, the child shall be delivered as soon as possible to the court or to the department of family services pending a hearing.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 236, § 4.

The department of family services shall promptly notify the court and the district attorney of any child being cared for by the department without a court order and shall deliver the child to the court upon request.

The department of family services shall care for the child under this section pursuant to temporary protective custody provisions as specified in W.S.

14-3-208

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2005, ch. 236, §§ 2, 4.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section to provide that the department of family services rather than a shelter care facility is responsible where a child is in immediate need of placement prior to a hearing, repealing former (b), which pertained to shelter care placement, and adding (d).

§ 14-3-408.
Notice of shelter care to be given district attorney; written statement required; duty of district attorney.

When a child is taken into temporary protective custody without a court order and is placed in shelter care pursuant to W.S. 14-3-405(a) or (b), the person taking temporary protective custody of the child shall notify the district attorney without delay. Also the person shall as soon as possible file a brief written statement with the district attorney setting forth the facts which led to taking the child into custody and the reason why the child was not released.

Upon receiving notice that a child is being held in shelter care, the district attorney shall immediately review the need for shelter care and may order the child released unless he determines shelter care is necessary under the provisions of W.S. 14-3-406(a) or unless ordered by the court.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2005, ch. 236, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a) substituted “temporary protective custody” for “custody” and inserted the internal reference.

Due process.—

Juvenile court violated a father’s right to due process because it failed to give him reasonable notice and a meaningful opportunity to be heard in the child protection action; many of the requirements of the Child Protection Act were not followed because the father was not informed when the child was taken into protective custody or of the shelter care hearing; the father and his family were not considered by the State or the juvenile court as options for the child’s placement. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

§ 14-3-409.
Taking of child into custody; shelter care hearing where no court order; conditional release; evidence; rehearing.

When a child is taken into temporary protective custody without a court order or under an ex parte emergency order, a petition as provided in W.S.

14-3-412

shall be promptly filed and presented to the court. A shelter care hearing shall be held as soon as reasonably possible not later than forty-eight (48) hours, excluding weekends and legal holidays, after the child is taken into temporary protective custody to determine if further shelter care is required pending further court action. Written notice stating the time, place and purpose of the hearing shall be given to the child and to his parents, guardian or custodian.

At the commencement of the hearing the judge shall advise the child and his parents, guardian or custodian of:

The contents of the petition and the nature of the allegations contained therein;

Their right to counsel as provided in W.S.

14-3-422

;

The right to confront and cross-examine witnesses or to present witnesses and evidence in their own behalf and the right to issuance of process by the court to compel the appearance of witnesses and the production of evidence;

The right to a jury trial as provided in W.S.

14-3-423

;

The right to appeal as provided in W.S.

14-3-432

; and

The state’s obligation, pursuant to W.S. 14-3-431(d), to file a petition to terminate parental rights when a child has been placed in foster care under the responsibility of the state for fifteen (15) months of the most recent twenty-two (22) months unless the court finds that one (1) of the exceptions listed in W.S. 14-3-431(m) applies.

An initial hearing may be held in conjunction with a shelter care hearing, provided the requirements of W.S.

14-3-413

,

14-3-414

and

14-3-426

have been met. The court shall set a time not to exceed sixty (60) days for an adjudicatory hearing, unless the court finds good cause to delay or postpone the hearing. In no case shall the court hold the adjudicatory hearing more than ninety (90) days after the date the petition is filed.

The court shall determine whether or not the child’s full-time shelter care is required to protect the child’s welfare pending further proceedings. If the court determines that returning the child to the home is contrary to the welfare of the child, the court shall enter the finding on the record and order the child placed in the legal custody of the department of family services. If the court finds that full-time shelter care is not required, the court shall order the child released and may impose one (1) or more of the following conditions:

Place the child in the custody and supervision of his parents, guardian or custodian, under the supervision of the department of family services or under the protective supervision of any individual or organization approved by the court that agrees to supervise the child; or

Impose any other terms and conditions of release deemed reasonably necessary to assure the appearance of the child at subsequent proceedings or necessary to his protection from harm.

All relevant and material evidence helpful in determining the need for shelter care may be admitted by the court even though not competent in an adjudicatory hearing on the allegations of the petition.

If a child is not released after a shelter care hearing and it appears by sworn statement of the parents, guardian or custodian that they did not receive notice and did not waive notice and appearance at the hearing, the court shall rehear the matter without delay.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 18, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2009, ch. 169, § 1; 2011, ch. 79, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote (a), decreasing the time within which a hearing must be held where a child is taken into temporary protective custody; in (b) added provisions pertaining to presenting witnesses and compelling the production of evidence and added (b)(vi); rewrote (c); in (d) inserted the second sentence; and made related changes throughout.

The 2009 amendment,

in (b)(vi), substituted “14-3-431(m)” for “14-3-431(d).”

Laws 2009, ch. 169, § 5 (b)
makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2009.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “A shelter” for “An informal shelter”; in (c), deleted “The parents, guardian or custodian shall be given an opportunity to admit or deny the allegations in the petition. If the allegations are admitted, the court shall make the appropriate adjudication and may proceed immediately to a disposition of the case, provided the court has the predisposition report and multidisciplinary team recommendations, in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

14-3-429

, except that a commissioner acting in the absence or incapacity of the judge may take testimony to establish a factual basis and accept an admission and perform all other requirements of the initial hearing but shall not proceed to disposition. If denied” at the beginning, and inserted the first sentence; and in the introductory language of (d), deleted “Regardless of whether the allegations in the petition are admitted or denied” at the beginning; and made related changes.

Due process.—

Juvenile court violated a father’s right to due process because it failed to give him reasonable notice and a meaningful opportunity to be heard in the child protection action; many of the requirements of the Child Protection Act were not followed because the father was not informed when the child was taken into protective custody or of the shelter care hearing; the father was materially prejudiced by the due process violations because his lack of involvement colored the juvenile court’s ruling. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

Failure to advise of right to counsel.—

Even though the juvenile court transgressed a clear and unequivocal rule of law when it failed to advise the father of his right to counsel at his first appearance in the permanency hearing and thereafter failed to act on the father’s initial request for appointment of counsel, the father failed to establish that these errors materially prejudiced him, and therefore the court found no plain error. FH v. State (In the Interest of ECH), 2018 WY 83, 423 P.3d 295,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2018).

Jurisdiction. —

In the absence of unequivocal language to the contrary, a juvenile court did not lose jurisdiction to consider a neglect action when it dismissed without prejudice an initial neglect petition because the adjudicatory hearing was not held within 90 days of the filing of the petition as required by this section and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-426

and it allowed the petition to be refiled; the juvenile court's remedy of the situation gave due attention to the 90-day deadline, while still protecting the child, and mother was afforded due process protections and she was not unfairly prejudiced by the delay.
JA v. State, 2008 WY 15,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Feb. 8, 2008).

Court complied with statutory requirements. —

Trial court did not err in denying a mother's motion to withdraw her admission of child neglect because the court complied with Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 14-3-409(b) and 14-3-426(a) by carefully advising the mother of her rights in the placement proceedings, and of the consequences that could result from an admission or a finding of neglect; that was as far as the court was required to go.
Jet v. State (In re DRT), 2010 WY 137, 241 P.3d 489,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2010).

Cited

in

DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re “H” Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003); RH v. State (in the Interest of DRS), 2011 WY 128, 261 P.3d 697,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Sept. 14, 2011); Scott v. Bd. of Trs., 2015 WY 128,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Sept. 18, 2015).

§ 14-3-410.
Shelter care hearing conducted by commissioner; authority and duty; review by court.

In the absence or incapacity of the judge, the shelter care hearing may be conducted by a district court commissioner of the county in which the child is being held in shelter care.

The commissioner may make any order concerning the child’s release or continued shelter care as authorized to the judge under W.S.

14-3-409

. If the child is not released after the hearing, the commissioner shall promptly file with the court a complete written resume of the evidence adduced at the hearing and his reasons for not releasing the child. The commissioner shall conduct the hearing pursuant to W.S.

14-3-409

. The hearing shall be conducted in the presence of counsel and guardian ad litem, if so appointed. The commissioner may also appoint counsel, appoint a guardian ad litem, order a predisposition report, appoint a multidisciplinary team, issue subpoenas or search warrants, order physical or medical examinations and authorize emergency medical, surgical or dental treatment all as provided in this act. The commissioner shall not make final orders of adjudication or disposition.

The court shall review the reports, orders and actions of the commissioner as soon as reasonably possible and confirm or modify the commissioner’s orders and actions as it deems appropriate.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2011, ch. 79, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b), inserted the third and fourth sentences, inserted “appoint counsel, appoint a guardian ad litem, order a predisposition report, appoint a multidisciplinary team” preceding “issue subpoenas or search warrants,” and substituted “this act” for “W.S.

14-3-417

through

14-3-420

.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), deleted “except that if the parent who had been advised of his rights wishes to admit the allegations, the court may take testimony to establish a factual basis and accept the admission and perform all other requirements of the initial hearing but shall not enter the adjudication or proceed to disposition” at the end of the third sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

§ 14-3-411.
Complaints alleging neglect; investigation and determination by district attorney.

Complaints alleging a child is neglected shall be referred to the office of the district attorney. The district attorney shall determine whether the best interest of the child requires that judicial action be taken. The department of family services and the county sheriff shall provide the district attorney with any assistance he may require in making an investigation. The district attorney shall prepare and file a petition with the court if he believes action is necessary to protect the interest of the child.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Need for separate investigation not shown. —

Mother did not show need for separate family services department investigation and substantiation of neglect where there had been a police investigation, a petition filed by a district attorney, and an adjudicatory hearing in the trial court.DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re "H" Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. Jan. 13, 2004).

Cited in

DB v. State (In re CRA), 2016 WY 24, 368 P.3d 294,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2016).

Quoted in

RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).